Arkansas, session 2025, HB1056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 10, Chapter 3, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 33 –
Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs

10-3-3301. Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs – Creation
– Members.
(a) There is established a joint committee of the House of
Representatives and the Senate to be known as the “Joint Committee on
Military and Veterans Affairs”.
(b)(1) The Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs shall be a
select committee of the House of Representatives and a joint committee of the
Senate whose members shall be selected as follows:
(A)(i) Twelve (12) members of the House of Representatives
to be selected as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.
(ii) One (1) alternate member for each of the House
*JET007*
01-30-2025 09:49:35 JET007

As Engrossed: S1/30/25 HB1056
members of the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs shall be
selected as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.
(iii) A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner
as the original selection; and
(B)(i) Eight (8) members of the Senate to consist of the
members of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.
(ii) A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as
a vacancy is filled on the Senate Committee on State Agencies and
Governmental Affairs.
(2) Members appointed to the Joint Committee on Military and
Veterans Affairs shall serve on the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans
Affairs in addition to their service on the regular standing, joint, and
select committees of the General Assembly.
(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate
one (1) of the House members of the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans
Affairs as the House Cochair of the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans
Affairs and one (1) of the House members of the Joint Committee on Military
and Veterans Affairs as the House Co-Vice Chair of the Joint Committee on
Military and Veterans Affairs.
(4) The Chair of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and
Governmental Affairs shall serve as the Senate Cochair of the Joint Committee
on Military and Veterans Affairs and the Vice Chair of the Senate Committee
on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall serve as the Senate Co-Vice
Chair of the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs.

10-3-3302. Powers and Duties of Joint Committee on Military and
Veterans Affairs.
(a) The Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs may meet
during:
(1) A regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session
of the General Assembly;
(2) An extended recess of the General Assembly; and
(3) The interim between legislative sessions of the General
Assembly.
(b) A bill or resolution introduced during a legislative session in
either house of the General Assembly pertaining to military or veterans
01-30-2025 09:49:35 JET007

As Engrossed: S1/30/25 HB1056
affairs may be referred to the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans
Affairs.
(c)(1) The Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs shall make
continuing studies concerning issues related to military and veterans
affairs, either initiated by the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans
Affairs or referred to it by either house of the General Assembly for study.
(2) Interim study proposals and resolutions filed with the
Legislative Council under § 10-3-214 for review and referral to the
appropriate interim committee of the General Assembly, relating to military
and veterans affairs, shall be referred to the Joint Committee on Military
and Veterans Affairs.

10-3-3303. Interim committee meetings – Expenses – Staff.
(a)(1) Members are entitled to per diem and mileage for attendance at
meetings of the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs at the rate
provided by law to be paid from funds appropriated for payment of per diem
and mileage for attendance at meetings of interim committees of the House of
Representatives and the Senate.
(2) The per diem and mileage, including reimbursement for
expenses for attending out-of-state meetings as provided by law, shall be
paid from funds appropriated for per diem, mileage, and expenses of members
of the General Assembly for attending interim committee meetings or from
other funds provided by law for that purpose.
(b) The Bureau of Legislative Research shall furnish such staff
assistance as may be requested by the Joint Committee on Military and
Veterans Affairs.
(c) All other appropriate state agencies, including without limitation
the Department of the Military and the Department of Veterans Affairs, shall
be available to assist the Joint Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs
on matters before it, as may be requested by the Joint Committee on Military
and Veterans Affairs.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the State of Arkansas faces
increased and ongoing issues due to the growth of the military presence in
the state, that the state must face and address these issues to better
01-30-2025 09:49:35 JET007

As Engrossed: S1/30/25 HB1056
protect our veterans and their families, that protection of our veterans and
their families is paramount to the safety of our state and nation, and that
this act is immediately necessary as veterans’ issues are crucial and vital
to the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Evans






















01-30-2025 09:49:35 JET007